North Carolina, session 2025, HB472.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 7 of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 20-219.3A. Commercial booting.
A commercial motor vehicle shall not be immobilized using a device such as a boot or any
other device for the purposes of parking enforcement. Using an immobilization device on a
commercial vehicle in violation of this section is a Class 2 misdemeanor."
SECTION 2. Article 7A of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 20-219.15. Return of commercial cargo.
Notwithstanding G.S. 20-219.10(a) to the contrary, a tower of a nonconsensual tow or tow
pursuant to the direction of a law enforcement officer shall promptly return any commercial cargo
towed by the tower to the owner of the commercial cargo, or to a designee of the owner, upon
request. In the case of a trailer containing commercial cargo, the tower shall allow the trailer
containing the commercial cargo to be exchanged with a trailer of similar type that is in working
condition and was manufactured within five years of the manufacturing date of the original
trailer, or newer, as arranged by the commercial cargo owner."
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies
to offenses committed on or after that date. The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes
law.
*H472-v-2*